Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB488.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1301.19(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, amended July 17, 2024 (P.L.910, No.81), is amended to read:Section 1301.19. Claim for Property Paid or Delivered.--* * *(b) Regardless of whether a claim is filed under subsection (a), the State Treasurer may pay or deliver any property paid or delivered to the Commonwealth under this article, or the proceeds from the sale of the property, to a person if the State Treasurer finds that a report filed under section 1301.11 identifies the person as the sole owner of the property and the value of the property or proceeds is less than five [hundred dollars ($500)] thousand dollars ($5,000).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0488PN0472 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819